Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Social Worker Safety

194A.560.
Sections and amendments to be known as “Boni Frederick Bill.”

In honor of Boni Frederick who lost her life in the performance of her official duties, KRS 194A.560, 194A.562, 194A.564, 194A.566, and 605.170, and the amendments made to KRS 194A.065 in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 140, shall be known as the “Boni Frederick Bill.”

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 140, § 1, effective April 5, 2007.

194A.562.
Risk assessments on local offices of Division of Service Regions — Remediation where staff safety inadequate.

The cabinet shall conduct risk assessments on all local offices of the Division of Service Regions of the Department for Community Based Services and remediate the office environments that do not provide adequate safety and protection for cabinet staff to the extent possible with consideration of office space lease arrangements and availability of funding for office renovations.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 140, § 4, effective April 5, 2007.

194A.564.
Study group to make recommendations on personnel classifications for state agency social workers — Safety training — Report.

The cabinet secretary shall designate a study group composed of personnel within the Department for Community Based Services’ field services staff and any other persons deemed necessary to make recommendations regarding personnel classifications for state agency social workers. The study group shall include in its deliberations, but is not limited to, special personnel designations that would permit or require specialized personal safety training and other requirements that reflect the sometimes dangerous nature of official job duties of state agency social workers. The study group shall report its recommendations by November 15, 2007, to the Governor and the Interim Joint Committees on Appropriations and Revenue and Health and Welfare.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 140, § 5, effective April 5, 2007.

194A.566.
Risk or safety assessment upon request of front-line staff — Accompaniment by local law enforcement officer.

Front-line staff may request a risk or safety assessment prior to an investigation or delivery of services in a community setting. The direct supervisor of the requesting front-line staff and the safety liaison officer if a safety liaison officer position is designated for the county shall conduct the safety or risk assessment. If the situation warrants the accompaniment of front-line staff by a local law enforcement officer, the supervisor shall make the request to the local law enforcement agency.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 140, § 6, effective April 5, 2007.